Idaho, session 2025, H0166.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 60, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 60-106B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
60-106B. ELECTRONIC PUBLICATION. (1) Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, any person, governmental entity, or business or other
entity required or permitted under the laws of the state of Idaho to publish
any notice in a newspaper may instead electronically publish such notice on
the state controller's website as provided in this section and pursuant to
the staggered implementation schedule provided in subsection (4) of this
section. If all requirements of this section are met, notices electroni-
cally published pursuant to this section shall have the same legal effect as
notices published in a newspaper pursuant to section 60-106, Idaho Code.
(2) The minimum publishing dates and duration requirements under the
laws of the state of Idaho for publishing notices in a print newspaper shall
apply equally to notices electronically published pursuant to this section.
(3) A governmental entity that electronically publishes any notice
pursuant to this section shall:
(a) Comply with all advance notice requirements regarding the number of
days of advance notice required prior to government action; and
(b) Comply with the agenda requirements provided in section 74-204,
Idaho Code.
(4) The state controller shall facilitate the receipt, storage, and
publication of notices that are published pursuant to this section and en-
sure that the same are accessible to the public free of charge. To fulfill
the requirements of this section, the state controller may adopt a staggered
implementation schedule, allowing for the phased inclusion of specific cat-
egories of notices as the program progresses. No later than January 1, 2026,
the state controller shall ensure that the electronic publication program is
capable of the receipt, storage, and publication of all notices authorized
to be electronically published under this section by all state agencies. No
later than January 1, 2027, the state controller shall ensure that the elec-
tronic publication program is fully operational for the receipt, storage,


and publication of all notices authorized for electronic publication under
this section and shall also implement functionality on its website to allow
users to subscribe to receive electronic notifications of public meeting
notices of governmental entities, with the ability to filter such notices
by the location of the public meeting and the location of any project site
address required by law to be included in a public meeting notice.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, includ-
ing the staggered implementation schedule provided in subsection (4) of this
section, any governmental entity that is required by law to publish any no-
tice in a newspaper may instead publish an abbreviated notice in the newspa-
per that shall include the title and date of such notice accompanied by an in-
ternet link to a webpage on the governmental entity's official website con-
taining an electronic copy of the complete notice. A governmental entity may
also provide in such abbreviated notice a quick response code or barcode that
directs the reader to the same webpage as the internet link. If all require-
ments of this subsection are met, abbreviated newspaper notices published
pursuant to this subsection shall have the same legal effect as notices pub-
lished in a newspaper pursuant to section 60-106, Idaho Code.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) "Electronically publish" or "electronic publication" means the
posting of digital information, including any notice, on the state
controller's website or, where applicable, the official website of a
governmental entity through the publication of an internet link in a
newspaper, in the manner provided in this section.
(b) "Governmental entity" has the same meaning provided in section
74-403, Idaho Code, and shall include all taxing districts in the state.
(c) "Notice" means any type of notice, publication, or other informa-
tion required by the laws of the state of Idaho to be published in a news-
paper.
(d) "State agency" means the state of Idaho and any officer, agency,
board, commission, department, or similar body of the executive branch
of the state government.
(7) This section does not relieve a governmental entity of the duty to
mail any notice required to be mailed by the laws of the state of Idaho.
SECTION 2. That Section 60-109A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
60-109A. PUBLICATION BY FIRST CLASS MAIL. Any notice required by law
to be published by any regional board, commission, department, or author-
ity created by or pursuant to statute; or by any county, city, school dis-
trict, special district, any joint district, or other political subdivision
of the state of Idaho may be published by mailing such notice by first class
mail, postage prepaid, to the residents of such jurisdiction; provided, how-
ever, that publication by mail as provided for herein, shall constitute le-
gal notice only if the cost of mailing, including preparation, materials and
postage, is less than the cost of other publication required by law. Notice
may be included with regularly occurring mailings such as utility billing.
Proof of such mailing shall be by sworn affidavit of the duly constituted of-
ficers of the body publishing the notice.


SECTION 3. That Section 60-106B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Chapter 1, Title 60, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 60-106B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
60-106B. ELECTRONIC PUBLICATION. (1) Notwithstanding any provision
of law to the contrary, any person, governmental entity, or business or other
entity required or permitted under the laws of the state of Idaho to publish
notices in a newspaper may instead electronically publish such notices on
the state controller's website. If all requirements of this section are met,
notices electronically published pursuant to this section shall have the
same legal effect as notices published in a newspaper pursuant to section
60-106, Idaho Code.
(2) The minimum publishing dates and duration requirements under the
laws of the state of Idaho for publishing notices in a print newspaper shall
apply equally to notices electronically published pursuant to this section.
(3) A governmental entity that electronically publishes any notice
pursuant to this section shall:
(a) Comply with all advance notice requirements regarding the number of
days of advance notice required prior to government action; and
(b) Comply with the agenda requirements provided in section 74-204,
Idaho Code.
(4) The state controller shall facilitate the receipt, storage, and
publication of notices that are published pursuant to this section and en-
sure that the same are accessible to the public free of charge. The state
controller shall implement functionality on its website to allow users to
subscribe to receive electronic notifications of public meeting notices
of governmental entities, with the ability to filter such notices by the
location of the public meeting and the location of any project site address
required by law to be included in a public meeting notice.
(5) As used in this section:
(a) "Electronically publish" or "electronic publication" means the
posting of digital information on the state controller's website in the
manner provided in this section.
(b) "Governmental entity" has the same meaning provided in section
74-403, Idaho Code, and shall include all taxing districts in the state.
(c) "Notice" means any type of notice, publication, or other informa-
tion required by the laws of the state of Idaho to be published in a news-
paper.
(6) This section does not relieve a governmental entity of the duty to
mail any notice required to be mailed by the laws of the state of Idaho.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall be in full force and ef-
fect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 3 and 4 of this act shall
be in full force and effect on and after January 1, 2027.